Florida, session 2026, HB93.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 395.1013, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
395.1013 Smoke evacuation systems required.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Smoke evacuation system" means equipment that
effectively captures and filters surgical smoke before the smoke
makes contact with the eyes or respiratory tracts of occupants
in the room.
(b) "Surgical smoke" means the gaseous byproduct produced
by energy-generating devices such as lasers and electrosurgical
devices. The term includes, but is not limited to, surgical
plume, smoke plume, bio-aerosols, laser-generated airborne
contaminants, and lung-damaging dust.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb93-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 93 2026
(2) By January 1, 2027, each licensed facility shall adopt
and implement policies to prevent exposure to surgical smoke,
where there is a substantial likelihood of risk to patients and
personnel, by using a smoke evacuation system or any other
appropriate measure.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb93-01-c1